Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2128.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 6109(e)(1)(i) and 6111.1(i) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 6109. Licenses.* * *(e) Issuance of license.--(1) A license to carry a firearm shall be for the purpose of carrying a firearm concealed on or about one's person or in a vehicle and shall be issued if, after an investigation not to exceed 45 days, it appears that the applicant is an individual concerning whom no good cause exists to deny the license. A license shall not be issued to any of the following:123456789101112131415161718 (i) An individual whose character and reputation is such that the individual would be likely to act in a manner dangerous to public safety. A sheriff may consider a finding of a violation of 49 CFR 1540.111 (relating to carriage of weapons, explosives and incendiaries by individuals) as good cause for license denial.* * *§ 6111.1. Pennsylvania State Police.* * *(i) Reports.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall annually compile and report to the General Assembly, on or before December 31, the following information for the previous year:(1) number of firearm sales, including the types of firearms;(2) number of applications for sale of firearms denied, number of challenges of the denials and number of final reversals of initial denials;(3) summary of the Pennsylvania State Police's activities, including the average time taken to complete a criminal history, juvenile delinquency history or mental health record check; [and](4) uniform crime reporting statistics compiled by the Pennsylvania State Police based on the National Incident-based Reporting System[.];(5) number of licenses to carry a firearm issued under section 6109(e) (relating to licenses);(6) number of licenses to carry a firearm revoked under section 6109(i);(7) number of applications for a license to carry a firearm submitted under section 6109(b); and20260HB2128PN2750 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) number of applications for a license to carry a firearm denied under section 6109(g).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2128PN2750 - 3 - 1234